Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1757.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 41, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 41-4259 and 41-4260, to read: START_STATUTE41-4259. Duty to register; foreign principles; lobbyists; violation; classification; enforcement; fees; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, A foreign principal shall submit to the Department a copy of the foreign principal's lobbying registration and a list of THE FOREIGN PRINCIPAL'S current lobbyists pursuant to section 41-1232. B. Each foreign principal shall reregister not later than 5:00 p.m. on the second Monday in January of each odd-numbered year unless at that time the foreign principal no longer engages, employs, retains or uses any lobbyist. beginning December 1 of each even-numbered year, A foreign principal shall file its registration at any time. Each foreign principal shall amend its registration statement within five business days after any change in the information required by subsection A of this section. C. The Department shall post publicly on its website a database of all foreign principals and each FOREIGN PRINCIPAL'S lobbyists in this state. D. A person who is a designated lobbyist, lobbyist for compensation or authorized lobbyist for a foreign principal in this state shall disclose that fact to all of the following: 1. Any legislator the person is lobbying for the first time or on any subsequent request of a legislator. 2. Any public official or employee of a public body each time the person is lobbying for the procurement of materials, services or construction in this state. The person shall also disclose the name of that person's client. E. A person is guilty of a class 1 MISDEMEANOR if either of the following occurs: 1. A person knowingly violates this section. 2. a person knowingly submits any information prescribed in this section that contains any materially false statement or material omission. F. Any alleged violation of this section may be investigated and prosecuted by the attorney general or by the county attorney of the county in which the alleged offense occurred. G. The director shall: 1. Prescribe and publish the registration and registration amendment forms to carry out this section. 2. Refer to the attorney general or county attorney to INVESTIGATE any matter in which the director has reason to believe constitutes a violation of this section. H. The Department may adopt rules, develop forms and implement procedures as necessary to implement this section. I. Each foreign principal that registers a lobbyist for compensation or a designated lobbyist who receives compensation for lobbying from the foreign principal, at the time of registering or reregistering, shall pay a registration or reregistration fee set by the Department. The Department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, Registration and reregistration fees collected in the foreign principal lobbyist registration fund established by section 41-4260. J. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Authorized lobbyist" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1231. 2. "Designated lobbyist" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1231. 3. "Foreign PRINCIPAL" means any of the following: (a) a government of a foreign country. (b) a foreign political party. (c) a person outside of the United States, unless it is established that the person is an individual and a citizen of and domiciled within the United States, or that the person is not an individual and is organized under or created by the laws of the United States or of any State or other place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States and has its principal place of business within the United States. (d) a partnership, association, corporation, organization or other combination of persons organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, a foreign country. (e) A partnership, association, corporation, organization or other combination of persons that is at least thirty percent owned by a partnership, association, corporation, organization or other combination of persons organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, a foreign country. 4. "Lobbyist" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1231. 5. "Lobbyist for compensation" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1231. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-4260. Foreign principal lobbyist registration fund The Foreign principal lobbyist registration fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations and fees collected by the department pursuant to section 41-4259. The department shall administer the fund.  monies in the fund are subject to LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATION and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Exemption from rulemaking Notwithstanding any other law, for the purposes of this act, the Arizona department of homeland security is exempt from the rulemaking requirements of title 41, chapter 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, for one year after the effective date of this act.